Arkansas, session 2025, SB282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 116, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-116-108. Election for fluoridation of water — Definition.
(a) Customers of a public water system shall have the option to hold
an election of the qualified electors of each county supplied by the public
water system to determine whether or not the public water system shall
fluoridate the water.
(b)(1) An election under this section may be called by:
(A) A petition for each county supplied by the public
water system signed by no less than five percent (5%) of the total number of
votes cast within the county for the office of county judge in the last
election; or
(B) A majority vote of the quorum court of a county
supplied by the public water system.
(2)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, an election under this section shall be held at the next general
*SSS164*
02/24/2025 3:49:55 PM SSS164

SB282
election.
(B) A subsequent election in the public water system under
this section shall not be held earlier than four (4) years after an election
is held under this section.
(3) Except as provided in this section, the election under this
section shall be held and conducted in accordance with the general election
laws of this state.
(4) The question of whether to fluoridate the water in the
public water system shall be placed upon the ballots of the qualified
electors in the following form:
"___ FOR THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF THE
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM]
___ AGAINST THE FLUORIDATION OF WATER IN [DESCRIPTION OF
PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM].".
(c)(1) The petition under this section shall be filed with the county
clerk of the county where the sponsor of the petition resides no less than
one hundred twenty (120) days before the general election.
(2) No more than ten (10) days after the filing of the petition
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the county clerk shall:
(A) Verify the petition;
(B) Certify the petition; and
(C) Notify the county boards of election commissioners for
the counties within the public water system and the board of directors of the
public water system of the verification and certification of the petition.
(3) The petition shall clearly state:
(A) The boundaries of the public water system; and
(B) That the petition is to elect "for" or "against"
fluoridation of the water in the public water system.
(d) If the petition is sufficient, the question of whether to
fluoridate the water in the public water system shall be placed on the ballot
in each county supplied by the public water system.
(e) If the majority of the qualified electors of the majority of the
counties supplied by the public water system elect to prohibit fluoridation
of water, the public water system shall cease fluoridation of the water
within thirty (30) days of the certification of the election results.
(f) As used in this section, "public water system" means a facility,
02/24/2025 3:49:55 PM SSS164

SB282
including without limitation a parent system, consecutive system, or other
system, that holds, treats, and supplies water directly or through a
consecutive system or consecutive systems to five thousand (5,000) persons or
more.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-7-136(b), concerning a statewide
fluoridation program, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
the company, corporation, municipality, county, government agency, or other
entity that owns or controls a water system shall control the quantity of
fluoride in the water so as to maintain a fluoride content established by the
Department of Health.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the board of a public water system may elect to prohibit
fluoridation of the water it supplies.
(B) The results of an election under § 14-16-108 shall
supersede any decision of the board of a public water system regarding the
fluoridation of the water it supplies.


















02/24/2025 3:49:55 PM SSS164